District of Columbia statutes.
25-115

Temporary license requirements and qualifications.

(a)

A temporary license shall authorize the licensee temporarily to sell or permit the consumption of alcoholic beverages at the specific premises described for consumption on the premises where sold. The license may be issued for a banquet, picnic, bazaar, fair, or similar public gathering where food is served for consumption on the premises. No alcoholic beverages shall be sold or served to a customer in an unopened container.

(b)

A temporary license shall be issued for no more than 4 consecutive days.

(c)

The issuance of a temporary license shall be solely in the discretion of the Board.

(d)

If the applicant has failed to control the environment of a previous event associated with a temporary license or has sustained community complaints or police action, the Board may deny the license application.

(e)

There shall be 2 classes of temporary licenses:

(1)

Class F (beer and wine); and

(2)

Class G (spirits, beer, and wine).

(f)

The holder of a temporary license shall be permitted to receive deliveries from a wholesaler up to 48 hours before a Board-approved event occurring on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday. The alcoholic beverages delivered pursuant to this subsection shall not be consumed until the date and time of the event and shall be stored in a secure location.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 324, ch. 4, § 11
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 1
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 997, ch. 588
July 2, 1935, 49 Stat. 444, ch. 359
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 898, 899, ch. 756, §§ 3-7
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, §§ 1, 2
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 133, ch. 146, title V, § 501
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(d)
May 31, 1962, 76 Stat. 89, Pub. L. 87-470, § 1
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 2
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-102, § 2(a), (b), 23 DCR 8732
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-157, § 2(b), 27 DCR 5117
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 6, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-204, § 2, 30 DCR 185
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law, 5-16, § 3, 30 DCR 3193
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(a), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 5, 34 DCR 907
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-40, § 2(b), 38 DCR 4974
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(e), 41 DCR 1658
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-202, § 2(b), 45 DCR 8412
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(1), 46 DCR 3142
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1702(c), 49 DCR 6968
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(e), 60 DCR 3410

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-309.10 and § 25-104.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-115.
1973 Ed., § 25-111.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-190 rewrote subsec. (b) which had read as follows: “(b) A temporary license may be issued for no more than 2 consecutive days.”
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-310 added (f).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1702(c) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary addition of (f), see § 2(e) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(e) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).